Nebraska statutes.
Revised Statutes Supplement, 202581-15,302
Terms, defined.

For purposes of the Nebraska Environmental Response Act:

(1) Cleanup means all actions necessary to contain, collect, secure, control, identify, prevent, mitigate, analyze, treat, disperse, remove, or dispose of a pollutant necessary to restore the environment to the extent practicable and to minimize the harmful effects from the release in conformance with applicable federal and state environmental standards and substantive requirements;

(2) Cleanup costs means all costs incurred by the state, a political subdivision of the state, an agent of the state, or any other person participating, with the approval of the department, in the prevention, mitigation, or cleanup of a release of a pollutant, including a proportionate share of those costs necessary to maintain the services authorized in the act. Costs include oversight of the cleanup, staff time, and materials and supplies used to secure and mitigate the release of pollutants;

(3) Department means the Department of Water, Energy, and Environment;

(4) Director means the Director of Water, Energy, and Environment;

(5) Environmental lien means a lien for cleanup costs;

(6) Person has the same meaning as provided in section 81-1502;

(7) Pollutant means one or more substances or combinations of substances that alter the natural physical, chemical, or biological properties of any air, land, or waters of the state in such quantities that are harmful, detrimental, or injurious to plant or animal life, property, or the public health, safety, or welfare;

(8) Release means any emission, discharge, spill, leak, pumping, pouring, escaping, emptying, or dumping of a pollutant into or onto the air, land, or waters of the state, except when performed in compliance with the conditions of a federal or state environmental permit; and

(9) Waters of the state has the same meaning as provided in section 81-1502.

Laws 2022, LB1102, § 2;

Laws 2025, LB317, § 447.